Hawaii statutes.
[§453D-10] Licensure; fees. A license
shall be issued to a person deemed to be qualified under section 453D-7 upon
the payment of a license fee to be determined by the department and shall be
valid for three years. [L 2004, c 209, pt of §2; am L 2008, c 206, §1]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next